Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.250

Definitions. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Business licensing system" means the mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which business licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed utilizing a business license application and a business license expiration date common to each renewable license endorsement.

(2) "Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an official document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags, permits, written statements, or any other form of certification document that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant material, including Christmas trees.

(3) "Christmas tree" means a cut evergreen tree:

(a) Of a marketable species;

(b) Managed to produce trees meeting United States number 2 or better standards for Christmas trees as specified by the United States department of agriculture; and

(c) Evidencing periodic maintenance practices of shearing or culturing, or both; weed and brush control; and one or more of the following practices: Basal pruning, fertilization, insect and disease control, stump culture, soil cultivation, and irrigation.

(4) "Christmas tree grower" means any person who grows Christmas trees for sale.

(5) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the department and a person engaged in growing, handling, or moving articles, plants, or plant products regulated under this chapter or title, in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated requirements.

(6) "Consignor" means the person named in the invoice, bill, or other shipping document accompanying a horticultural plant as the person from whom the horticultural plant has been received for shipment.

(7) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(8) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's duly authorized representative.

(9) "Horticultural facilities" means, but is not limited to, the premises where horticultural plants or Christmas trees are grown, stored, handled or delivered for sale or transportation, or where records required under this chapter are stored or kept, and all vehicles and equipment used to transport horticultural plants or Christmas trees.

(10) "Horticultural plant" includes, but is not limited to, any horticultural, floricultural, or viticultural plant, or turf, for planting, propagation or ornamentation growing or otherwise. The term does not apply to potato, garlic, or onion planting stock or to cut plant material, except plant parts used for propagative purposes.

(11) "Inspection and/or certification" means, but is not limited to, the inspection by the director of horticultural plants or Christmas trees at any time prior to, during, or subsequent to harvest or sale and the issuance by the director of a written certificate stating if the horticultural plants or Christmas trees are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. Inspection may include, but is not limited to, examination of horticultural plants or Christmas trees, taking samples, destructive testing, conducting interviews, taking photographs, and examining records.

(12) "Nursery dealer" means any person who sells horticultural plants or plants, grows, receives, or handles horticultural plants for the purpose of selling or planting for another person.

(13) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, society and association, and every officer, agent or employee thereof.

(14) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, a living stage of insect, mite, or other arthropod; nematode; slug, snail, or other mollusk; protozoa or other invertebrate animals; bacteria; fungus; virus; viroid; phytoplasma; weed or parasitic plant; or any organisms similar to or allied with any of the plant pests listed in this section; or any infectious substance; which can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or plant product or that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species.

(15) "Sell" means to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or to use as an inducement for the sale of another article or product.

(16) "This chapter" means this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

(17) "Turf" means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of grass varieties, or blends of grass varieties, and dichondra or use in residential and commercial landscapes.

[ 2013 c 144 s 2; (2013 c 144 s 1 expired July 1, 2014); 2007 c 335 s 1; 2000 c 144 s 1; 1993 c 120 s 1; 1990 c 261 s 1; 1985 c 36 s 1; 1982 c 182 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2013 c 144 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 144 s 57.]

Expiration date—2013 c 144 s 1: "Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 144 s 58.]

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: "This act expires July 1, 2030." [ 2019 c 206 s 1; 2013 c 72 s 1; 2007 c 335 s 19.]

PDFRCW 15.13.250

Definitions. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

For the purpose of this chapter:

(1) "Business licensing system" means the mechanism established by chapter 19.02 RCW by which business licenses, endorsed for individual state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed utilizing a business license application and a business license expiration date common to each renewable license endorsement.

(2) "Certificate" or "certificate of inspection" means an official document certifying compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The term "certificate" includes labels, rubber stamp imprints, tags, permits, written statements, or any other form of certification document that accompanies the movement of inspected and certified plant material.

(3) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the department and a person engaged in growing, handling, or moving articles, plants, or plant products regulated under this chapter or title, in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated requirements.

(4) "Consignor" means the person named in the invoice, bill, or other shipping document accompanying a horticultural plant as the person from whom the horticultural plant has been received for shipment.

(5) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's duly authorized representative.

(7) "Horticultural facilities" means, but is not limited to, the premises where horticultural plants are grown, stored, handled or delivered for sale or transportation, or where records required under this chapter are stored or kept, and all vehicles and equipment used to transport horticultural plants.

(8) "Horticultural plant" includes, but is not limited to, any horticultural, floricultural, or viticultural plant, or turf, for planting, propagation or ornamentation growing or otherwise. The term does not apply to potato, garlic, or onion planting stock or to cut plant material, except plant parts used for propagative purposes.

(9) "Inspection and/or certification" means, but is not limited to, the inspection by the director of horticultural plants at any time prior to, during, or subsequent to harvest or sale and the issuance by the director of a written certificate stating if the horticultural plants are in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. Inspection may include, but is not limited to, examination of horticultural plants, taking samples, destructive testing, conducting interviews, taking photographs, and examining records.

(10) "Nursery dealer" means any person who sells horticultural plants or plants, grows, receives, or handles horticultural plants for the purpose of selling or planting for another person.

(11) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, society and association, and every officer, agent or employee thereof.

(12) "Plant pests" means, but is not limited to, a living stage of insect, mite, or other arthropod; nematode; slug, snail, or other mollusk; protozoa or other invertebrate animals; bacteria; fungus; virus; viroid; phytoplasma; weed or parasitic plant; or any organisms similar to or allied with any of the plant pests listed in this section; or any infectious substance; which can directly or indirectly injure or cause disease or damage to any plant or plant product or that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species.

(13) "Sell" means to sell, hold for sale, offer for sale, handle, or to use as an inducement for the sale of another article or product.

(14) "This chapter" means this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.

(15) "Turf" means field-cultivated turf grass sod consisting of grass varieties, or blends of grass varieties, and dichondra for use in residential and commercial landscapes.

[ 2013 c 144 s 2; 2000 c 144 s 1; 1993 c 120 s 1; 1990 c 261 s 1; 1985 c 36 s 1; 1982 c 182 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2013 c 144 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 144 s 57.]